Kentucky statutes. TITLE XLII Miscellaneous Practice Provisions
CHAPTER 456 Civil Orders of Protection

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 102, § 19, effective January 1, 2016.

456.010.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter:

“Dating relationship” means a relationship between individuals who have or have had a relationship of a romantic or intimate nature. It does not include a casual acquaintanceship or ordinary fraternization in a business or social context. The following factors may be considered in addition to any other relevant factors in determining whether the relationship is or was of a romantic or intimate nature:

Declarations of romantic interest;

The relationship was characterized by the expectation of affection;

Attendance at social outings together as a couple;

The frequency and type of interaction between the persons, including whether the persons have been involved together over time and on a continuous basis during the course of the relationship;

The length and recency of the relationship; and

Other indications of a substantial connection that would lead a reasonable person to understand that a dating relationship existed;

“Dating violence and abuse” means:

Physical injury, serious physical injury, stalking, sexual assault, strangulation, or the infliction of fear of imminent physical injury, serious physical injury, sexual abuse, strangulation, or assault occurring between persons who are or have been in a dating relationship; or

Any conduct prohibited by KRS

525.125

,

525.130

,

525.135

, or

525.137

, or the infliction of fear of such imminent conduct, taken against a domestic animal when used as a method of coercion, control, punishment, intimidation, or revenge directed against a person with whom the perpetrator is or has been in a dating relationship, when that person has a close bond of affection to the domestic animal;

“Domestic animal” means a dog, cat, or other animal that is domesticated and kept as a household pet, but does not include animals normally raised for agricultural or commercial purposes;

“Foreign protective order” means any judgment, decree, or order of protection which is entitled to full faith and credit pursuant to 18

U.S.C. sec. 2265

which was not issued on the basis of domestic violence and abuse;

“Global positioning monitoring system” means a system that electronically determines a person’s location through a device worn by the person which does not invade his or her bodily integrity and which transmits the person’s latitude and longitude data to a monitoring entity;

“Order of protection” means any interpersonal protective order, including those issued on a temporary basis, and includes a foreign protective order;

“Sexual assault” refers to conduct prohibited as any degree of rape, sodomy, or sexual abuse under KRS Chapter 510 or a criminal attempt, conspiracy, facilitation, or solicitation to commit any degree of rape, sodomy, or sexual abuse, or incest under KRS

530.020

;

“Stalking” refers to conduct prohibited as stalking under KRS

508.140

or

508.150

, or a criminal attempt, conspiracy, facilitation, or solicitation to commit the crime of stalking;

“Strangulation” refers to conduct prohibited by KRS

508.170

and

508.175

, or a criminal attempt, conspiracy, facilitation, or solicitation to commit the crime of strangulation; and

“Substantial violation” means criminal conduct which involves actual or threatened harm to the person, family, or property, including a domestic animal, of an individual protected by an order of protection.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 102, § 19, effective January 1, 2016; 2019 ch. 183, § 4, effective June 27, 2019; 2021 ch. 175, § 3, effective April 1, 2021; 2022 ch. 158, § 3, effective July 14, 2022.

456.020.
Interpretation of chapter.

This chapter shall be interpreted to:

Allow victims to obtain effective, short-term protection against further wrongful conduct in order that their lives may be as secure and as uninterrupted as possible;

Expand the ability of law enforcement officers to effectively respond to further wrongful conduct so as to prevent future incidents and to provide assistance to the victims;

Provide peace officers with the authority to immediately apprehend and charge for violation of an order of protection any person whom the officer has probable cause to believe has violated an order of protection and to provide courts with the authority to conduct contempt of court proceedings for these violations;

Provide for the collection of data concerning incidents of dating violence and abuse, sexual assault, strangulation, and stalking in order to develop a comprehensive analysis of the numbers and causes of such incidents; and

Supplement and not repeal or supplant any duties, responsibilities, services, or penalties under KRS Chapters 209, 209A, and 620.

Nothing in this chapter is intended to trigger the application of the provisions of 18 U.S.C sec. 922(g) as to an interpersonal protective order issued on the basis of the existence of a current or previous dating relationship.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 102, § 20, effective January 1, 2016; 2019 ch. 183, § 5, effective June 27, 2019.

456.030.
Petition for interpersonal protective order.

A petition for an interpersonal protective order may be filed by:

A victim of dating violence and abuse;

A victim of stalking;

A victim of sexual assault; or

An adult on behalf of a victim who is a minor otherwise qualifying for relief under this subsection.

The petition may be filed in the victim’s county of residence or a county where the victim has fled to escape dating violence and abuse, stalking, or sexual assault.

The petition shall be verified and contain:

The name, age, address, occupation, residence, and school or postsecondary institution of the petitioner;

The name, age, address, occupation, residence, and school or postsecondary institution of the person or persons who have engaged in the alleged act or acts complained of in the petition;

The facts and circumstances which constitute the basis for the petition; and

The names, ages, and addresses of the petitioner’s minor children, if applicable.

The petition shall be filed on forms prescribed by the Administrative Office of the Courts and provided to the person seeking relief by the circuit clerk or by another individual authorized by the court to provide and verify petitions in emergency situations, such as law enforcement officers, Commonwealth’s or county attorneys, and regional rape crisis centers or domestic violence shelters.

All petitions requested, completed, and signed by persons seeking protection under this chapter shall be accepted and filed with the court.

Jurisdiction over petitions filed under this chapter shall be concurrent between the District Court and Circuit Court.

The Court of Justice shall provide a protocol for twenty-four (24) hour access to interpersonal protective orders in each county with any protocol, whether statewide or local, being subject to Supreme Court review and approval of the initial protocol and any subsequent amendments. This protocol may allow for petitions to be filed in or transferred to a court other than those specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection.

The Court of Justice may authorize by rule that petitions in a specific county be filed in accordance with a supplemental jurisdictional protocol adopted for that county. This protocol may provide for petitions to be filed in or transferred to a court other than those specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection.

1. In addition to the protocols for twenty-four (24) hour access established under paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection, before January 1, 2019, the Court of Justice shall provide protocols for filing, including electronic filing, of petitions for orders of protection at those regional rape crisis centers designated under KRS

211.600

, or regional domestic violence shelters designated under KRS

209A.045

, that elect to participate in any county’s twenty-four (24) hour access protocol.

2.

These protocols shall be subject to Supreme Court review for approval of the initial protocol and any subsequent amendments.

Any judge to whom a petition is referred under subsection (6) of this section shall have full authority to review and hear a petition and subsequently grant and enforce an interpersonal protective order.

If the judge of a court in which there is a pending request for modification or enforcement of an existing order of protection is unavailable or unable to act within a reasonable time, the proceedings may be conducted by any judge of the county in accordance with court rules.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 102, § 21, effective January 1, 2016; 2018 ch. 115, § 7, effective July 14, 2018.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/14/2018). Pursuant to
2018 Ky. Acts ch. 115, sec. 12, that Act shall be known as the Women's Dignity in the Justice System Act. This statute was amended in Section 7 of that Act.

456.040.
Review of petition for interpersonal protective order — Temporary interpersonal protective order.

The court shall review a petition for an interpersonal protective order immediately upon its filing. If the review indicates that dating violence and abuse, stalking, or sexual assault exists, the court shall summons the parties to an evidentiary hearing not more than fourteen (14) days in the future. If the review indicates that such a basis does not exist, the court may consider an amended petition or dismiss the petition without prejudice.

Service of the summons and hearing order under this subsection shall be made upon the adverse party personally and may be made in the manner and by the persons authorized to serve subpoenas under Rule 45.03 of the Rules of Civil Procedure. A summons may be reissued if service has not been made on the adverse party by the fixed court date and time.

If the review under this section also indicates the presence of an immediate and present danger of dating violence and abuse, sexual assault, or stalking, the court shall, upon the filing of the petition, issue ex parte a temporary interpersonal protective order that:

Authorizes relief appropriate to the situation utilizing the alternatives set out in KRS

456.060

;

Sets forth which communications, if any, as requested by the petitioner, are authorized and which communications are unauthorized;

Expires upon the conclusion of the evidentiary hearing required by this section unless extended or withdrawn by subsequent order of the court; and

Does not order or refer the parties to mediation unless requested by the petitioner, and the court finds that:

The petitioner’s request is voluntary and not the result of coercion; and

Mediation is a realistic and viable alternative to or adjunct to the issuance of an order sought by the petitioner.

Nothing in this paragraph shall be interpreted to place any restriction or restraint on the petitioner.

If an order is not issued under this subsection, the court shall note on the petition, for the record, any action taken or denied and the reason for it.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 102, § 22, effective January 1, 2016; 2022 ch. 143, § 4, effective July 14, 2022.

456.050.
Hearing on petition for interpersonal protective order.

Prior to or at a hearing on a petition for an interpersonal protective order:

The court may obtain the respondent’s Kentucky criminal and protective order history and utilize that information to assess what relief and which sanctions may protect against danger to the petitioner or other person for whom protection is being sought, with the information so obtained being provided to the parties in accordance with the Rules of Civil Procedure; and

If the petitioner or respondent is a minor, the court shall inquire whether the parties attend school in the same school system to assist the court in imposing conditions in the order that have the least disruption in the administration of education to the parties while providing appropriate protection to the petitioner.

If the adverse party is not present at the hearing ordered pursuant to KRS

456.040

and has not been served, a previously issued temporary interpersonal protective order shall remain in place, and the court shall direct the issuance of a new summons for a hearing set not more than fourteen (14) days in the future. If service has not been made on the adverse party before that hearing or a subsequent hearing, the temporary interpersonal protective order shall remain in place, and the court shall continue the hearing and issue a new summons with a new date and time for the hearing to occur, which shall be within fourteen (14) days of the originally scheduled date for the continued hearing. The court shall repeat the process of continuing the hearing and reissuing a new summons until the adverse party is served in advance of the scheduled hearing. If service has not been made on the respondent at least seventy-two (72) hours prior to the scheduled hearing, the court may continue the hearing no more than fourteen (14) days in the future. In issuing the summons, the court shall simultaneously transmit a copy of the summons or notice of its issuance and provisions to the petitioner.

The provisions of this section permitting the continuance of an interpersonal protective order shall be limited to six (6) months from the issuance of the temporary interpersonal protective order. If the respondent has not been served within that period, the order shall be rescinded without prejudice. Prior to the expiration of the temporary interpersonal protective order, the court shall provide notice to the petitioner stating that, if the petitioner does not file a new petition, the order shall be rescinded without prejudice.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 102, § 23, effective January 1, 2016.

456.060.
Ruing on petition for interpersonal protective order — Duration of order.

Following a hearing ordered under KRS

456.040

, if a court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that dating violence and abuse, sexual assault, or stalking has occurred and may again occur, the court may issue an interpersonal protective order:

Restraining the adverse party from:

Committing further acts of dating violence and abuse, stalking, or sexual assault;

Any unauthorized contact or communication with the petitioner or other person specified by the court;

Approaching the petitioner or other person specified by the court within a distance specified in the order, not to exceed five hundred (500) feet;

Going to or within a specified distance of a specifically described residence, school, or place of employment or area where such a place is located; and

Disposing of or damaging any of the property of the parties;

Authorizing, at the request of the petitioner:

Limited contact or communication between the parties that the court finds necessary; or

The parties to remain in a common area, which may necessitate them being closer than five hundred (500) feet under limited circumstances with specific parameters set forth by the court.

Nothing in this paragraph shall be interpreted to place any restriction or restraint on the petitioner;

Directing or prohibiting any other actions that the court believes will be of assistance in eliminating future acts of dating violence and abuse, stalking, or sexual assault, except that the court shall not order the petitioner to take any affirmative action;

Directing that either or both of the parties receive counseling services available in the community in dating violence and abuse cases; and

Awarding possession of any shared domestic animal to the petitioner.

In imposing a location restriction described in subsection (1)(a)4. of this section, the court shall:

Afford the petitioner and respondent, if present, an opportunity to testify on the issue of the locations and areas from which the respondent should or should not be excluded;

Only impose a location restriction where there is a specific, demonstrable danger to the petitioner or other person protected by the order;

Specifically describe in the order the locations or areas prohibited to the respondent; and

Consider structuring a restriction so as to allow the respondent transit through an area if the respondent does not interrupt his or her travel to harass, harm, or attempt to harass or harm the petitioner.

An interpersonal protective order shall be effective for a period of time fixed by the court, not to exceed three (3) years, and may be reissued upon expiration for subsequent periods of up to three (3) years each. The fact that an order has not been violated since its issuance may be considered by a court in hearing a request for a reissuance of the order.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 102, § 24, effective January 1, 2016; 2022 ch. 143, § 3, effective July 14, 2022; 2022 ch. 158, § 4, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/14/2022). This statute was amended by 2022 Ky. Acts chs. 143 and 158, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

456.070.
When protective order becomes effective and binding on respondent — Mutual protective orders — Petition hearing testimony later admissible only for impeachment purposes — Interpersonal protective order intake center.

A temporary or ordinary interpersonal protective order shall become effective and binding on the respondent when the respondent is given notice of the existence and terms of the order by a peace officer or the court or upon personal service of the order, whichever is earlier. A peace officer or court giving notice of an unserved order shall make all reasonable efforts to arrange for the order’s personal service upon the respondent. Once effective, a peace officer or the court may enforce the order’s terms and act immediately upon their violation.

Costs, fees, or bond shall not be assessed against or required of a petitioner for any filing, hearing, service, or order authorized by or required to implement this chapter.

A court shall not require mediation, conciliation, or counseling prior to or as a condition of issuing an interpersonal protective order.

Mutual protective orders may be issued only if:

Separate petitions have been filed by both parties; and

The orders are written with sufficient specificity to allow any peace officer to identify which party has violated the order.

Upon proper filing of a motion, either party may seek to amend an interpersonal protective order.

Testimony offered by an adverse party in a hearing ordered pursuant to KRS

456.040

shall not be admissible in any criminal proceeding involving the same parties except for purposes of impeachment.

The Court of Justice, county and Commonwealth’s attorneys, law enforcement agencies, and victim services organizations may jointly operate an interpersonal protective order intake center to assist persons who apply for relief under this chapter.

In cases where criminal conduct is alleged, a court may suggest that a petitioner voluntarily contact the county attorney. A court may not withhold or delay relief if the petitioner elects to not contact the county attorney.

A person’s right to apply for relief under this chapter shall not be affected by that person leaving his or her residence to avoid dating violence and abuse, sexual assault, or stalking.

A court shall order the omission or deletion of the petitioner’s address and the address of any minor children from any orders or documents to be made available to the public or to any person who engaged in the acts complained of in the petition.

If a petition under this chapter did not result in the issuance of a non-temporary interpersonal protective order, the court in which the petition was heard may for good cause shown order the expungement of the records of the case if:

Six (6) months have elapsed since the case was dismissed; and

During the six (6) months preceding the expungement request, the respondent has not been bound by an order of protection issued for the protection of any person, including an order of protection as defined in KRS

403.720

.

As used in this subsection, “expungement” has the same meaning as in KRS

431.079

.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 102, § 25, effective January 1, 2016.

456.080.
Disclosure of interpersonal protective orders upon filing KRS Chapter 403 action.

If the petitioner or respondent to an interpersonal protective order initiates an action under KRS Chapter 403, the party initiating the action shall make known to the court the existence and status of any interpersonal protective orders, which shall remain effective and enforceable until superseded by order of the court in which the KRS Chapter 403 case is filed.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 102, § 26, effective January 1, 2016.

456.090.
Law enforcement to assist protective order petitioner and victim of dating violence and abuse, sexual assault, or stalking — Statewide enforcement — Civil and criminal immunity.

A court issuing an interpersonal protective order shall direct the appropriate law enforcement agency to assist the petitioner in having the provisions of the order complied with.

When a law enforcement officer has reason to suspect that a person has been the victim of dating violence and abuse, sexual assault, or stalking, the officer shall use all reasonable means to provide assistance to the victim, including but not limited to:

Remaining at the location of the call for assistance so long as the officer reasonably suspects there is danger to the physical safety of individuals there without the presence of a law enforcement officer;

Assisting the victim in obtaining medical treatment, including transporting the victim to the nearest medical facility capable of providing the necessary treatment;

Advising the victim immediately of the rights available to them, including the provisions of this chapter; and

Completing a JC-3 form, or its equivalent replacement, and providing the information to the Criminal Justice Statistical Analysis Center pursuant to KRS

209A.110

.

Orders of protection shall be enforced in any county of the Commonwealth.

Officers acting in good faith under this chapter shall be immune from criminal and civil liability.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 102, § 27, effective January 1, 2016; 2022 ch. 224, § 6, effective July 14, 2022.

456.100.
Amendment of interpersonal protective order to require participation in global positioning monitoring system.

Upon a petitioner’s request and after an evidentiary hearing, a court may amend an interpersonal protective order to require a respondent to participate in a global positioning monitoring system if:

The respondent has committed a substantial violation of a previously entered interpersonal protective order;

The court has reviewed an updated history of the respondent’s Kentucky criminal and protective order history; and

The court makes a factual determination that the use of a global positioning monitoring system would increase the petitioner’s safety.

An order requiring participation in a global positioning monitoring system shall:

Require the respondent to pay the cost of participation up to the respondent’s ability to pay, with the system operator bearing any uncovered costs for indigent respondents;

State with specificity the locations or areas where the respondent is prohibited from being located or persons with whom the respondent shall have no contact;

Include the date that the order expires, which shall be no longer than the expiration date of the underlying interpersonal protective order, although participation may be extended if the underlying order is extended;

Require the entity that operates the monitoring system to immediately notify the petitioner, the local law enforcement agency named in the order, and the court if a respondent violates the order; and

Include any other information as the court deems appropriate.

The Administrative Office of the Courts shall prepare a publicly available informational pamphlet containing information on the method of applying for, hearing, amending, and terminating an order requiring participation in a global positioning monitoring system.

The Supreme Court may establish by rule a sliding scale of payment responsibility for indigent defendants for use in establishing required payments under subsection (2) of this section.

A person, county, or other organization may voluntarily agree to pay all or a portion of a respondent’s monitoring costs specified in this section.

An order requiring participation in a global positioning monitoring system may be shortened or vacated by the court either:

Upon request of the petitioner; or

Upon request of the respondent after an evidentiary hearing, if the respondent has not violated the order and:

Three (3) months have elapsed since the entry of the order; and

No previous request has been made by the respondent in the previous six (6) months.

A respondent who fails to wear, removes, tampers with, or destroys a global positioning monitoring system device in contravention of an order entered under this section shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 102, § 28, effective January 1, 2016.

456.110.
Entry of forms, affidavits, and orders of protection into Law Information Network of Kentucky.

All forms, affidavits, and orders of protection issued or filed pursuant to this chapter which require entry into the Law Information Network of Kentucky shall be entered on forms prescribed by the Administrative Office of the Courts after consultation with the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet. If the provisions of an interpersonal protective order are contained in an order which is narrative in nature, the prescribed form shall be used in addition to the narrative order.

The circuit clerk, in cooperation with the court, shall cause a copy of each summons or order issued pursuant to this chapter, or foreign protective order, fully completed and authenticated pursuant to this chapter, to be forwarded, by the most expedient means reasonably available and within twenty-four (24) hours following its filing with the clerk, to the appropriate agency designated for entry of interpersonal protective order records into the Law Information Network of Kentucky and to the agency assigned service. Any order or court record superseding, modifying, or otherwise affecting the status of an earlier summons or order shall likewise be forwarded by the circuit clerk to the appropriate Law Information Network of Kentucky entering agency and to the agency assigned service, if service is required. The clerk and the court shall comply with all provisions and guidelines of the Law Information Network of Kentucky for entry of the records.

Each agency designated for entry of summonses and orders issued pursuant to this chapter, or foreign protective orders authenticated pursuant to this chapter, into the Law Information Network of Kentucky shall, consistent with the provisions and guidelines of the Law Information Network of Kentucky, enter the records immediately upon receipt of copies forwarded to the agency in accordance with subsection (2) of this section.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 102, § 29, effective January 1, 2016.

456.120.
Foreign protective orders.

All foreign protective orders shall have the rebuttable presumption of validity. The validity of a foreign protective order shall only be determined by a court of competent jurisdiction. Until a foreign protective order is declared to be invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, it shall be given full faith and credit by all peace officers and courts in the Commonwealth.

All peace officers shall treat a foreign protective order as a legal document valid in Kentucky, and shall make arrests for a violation thereof in the same manner as for a violation of an order of protection issued in Kentucky.

The fact that a foreign protective order has not been entered into the Law Information Network of Kentucky shall not be grounds for a peace officer not to enforce the provisions of the order unless it is readily apparent to the peace officer to whom the order is presented that the order has either expired according to a date shown on the order, or that the order’s provisions clearly do not prohibit the conduct being complained of. Officers acting in good faith shall be immune from criminal and civil liability.

If the order has expired or its provisions do not prohibit the conduct being complained of, the officer shall not make an arrest unless the provisions of a Kentucky statute have been violated, in which case the peace officer shall take the action required by Kentucky law.

Civil proceedings and criminal proceedings for violation of a foreign protective order for the same violation of the protective order shall be mutually exclusive. Once either proceeding has been initiated, the other shall not be undertaken, regardless of the outcome of the original proceeding.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 102, § 30, effective January 1, 2016.

456.130.
Information required in interpersonal protective order to assist in full faith and credit determination.

In order to assist a court of another state in determining whether an order issued under this chapter is entitled to full faith and credit pursuant to 18

U.S.C. sec. 2265

:

All interpersonal protective orders shall include a statement certifying that the issuing court had jurisdiction over the parties and the matter, and that reasonable notice and opportunity to be heard has been given to the person against whom the order is sought sufficient to protect that person’s right to due process; and

All temporary interpersonal protective orders shall include a statement certifying that notice and opportunity to be heard has been provided within the time required by state law, and in any event within a reasonable time after the order is issued, sufficient to protect the respondent’s due process rights.

The Administrative Office of the Courts shall prescribe the form to be used for the purposes of this section.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 102, § 31, effective January 1, 2016.

456.140.
Filing copy of foreign protective order — Effect — Required affidavit — Certification by issuing court — Uncertified order.

A copy of a foreign protective order may be filed in the office of the clerk of any court of competent jurisdiction of this state. A foreign protective order so filed shall have the same effect and shall be enforced in the same manner as an interpersonal protective order issued by a court of this state.

At the time of the filing of the foreign protective order, the person filing the order shall file with the clerk of the court an affidavit on a form prescribed and provided by the Administrative Office of the Courts. The affidavit shall set forth the name, city, county, and state or other jurisdiction of the issuing court. The person shall certify in the affidavit the validity and status of the foreign protective order, and attest to the person’s belief that the order has not been amended, rescinded, or superseded by any orders from a court of competent jurisdiction. All foreign protective orders presented with a completed and signed affidavit shall be accepted and filed.

The affidavit signed by the applicant shall have space where the reviewing judge shall place information necessary to allow the order’s entry into the Law Information Network of Kentucky in the same manner as a Kentucky order.

If the person seeking to file the order presents a copy of the foreign protective order which is current by the terms of the order and has been certified by the clerk or other authorized officer of the court which issued it, the circuit clerk shall present it to the District Judge or Circuit Judge, who shall read the order and enter on the affidavit the information necessary to allow the order’s entry into the Law Information Network of Kentucky. The order shall not be subject to further verification and shall be accepted as authentic, current, and subject to full faith and credit.

If the order presented is current by the terms of the order but is not certified in the manner specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the circuit clerk shall present the order and the affidavit to the District or Circuit Judge, who shall read the order and enter on the affidavit the information necessary to allow the order’s entry into the Law Information Network of Kentucky. The order shall be subject to full faith and credit in the same manner as a Kentucky interpersonal protective order, but shall be subject to verification by the circuit clerk. The order shall be valid for a period of fourteen (14) days and may be renewed once for a period of fourteen (14) days if the circuit clerk has not received a certified copy of the order from the issuing jurisdiction. The clerk shall treat the foreign protective order in the same manner as an interpersonal protective order of this state issued pursuant to KRS

456.060

, except that no service on the adverse party shall be required pursuant to 18

U.S.C. sec. 2265

.

Upon the filing of an uncertified foreign protective order, the circuit clerk shall, within two (2) business days, contact the issuing court to request a certified copy of the order. If the certified copy of the order is received by the circuit clerk within the initial fourteen (14) day period, the clerk shall cause the information that certification has been received to be entered into the Law Information Network of Kentucky and shall notify the applicant for the order of the fact of its certification. A facsimile copy of a certified foreign protective order shall be grounds for the issuance of an interpersonal protective order.

If the clerk has not received a certified copy of the foreign protective order within ten (10) days, the clerk shall notify the court and the applicant that the order has not been received. The notice to the applicant, on a form prepared by the Administrative Office of the Courts, shall state that the foreign protective order will be extended for another fourteen (14) days, but will be dismissed at the expiration of that time. If the clerk informs the judge in writing that the certified foreign protective order has been requested but has not yet been received, the judge shall extend the foreign protective order for a period of fourteen (14) days. If certification of the foreign protective order is not received within twenty-eight (28) days, the foreign protective order shall expire and shall not be reissued. If the applicant meets the qualifications for the issuance of a Kentucky interpersonal protective order, the court may, upon proper application and showing of evidence, issue a Kentucky order in accordance with this chapter.

The right of a person filing a foreign protective order to bring an action to enforce the order instead of proceeding under this chapter remains unimpaired.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 102, § 32, effective January 1, 2016.

456.150.
Authentication of foreign protective order.

Upon ex parte review of the foreign protective order and the affidavit filed pursuant to KRS

456.140

, and after determining the order is entitled to full faith and credit in this Commonwealth pursuant to 18

U.S.C. sec. 2265

, the court shall declare the order to be authenticated and record the finding on the affidavit.

If the court declares the order to be authenticated, the court shall:

Direct the appropriate law enforcement agency to assist the petitioner in having the provisions of the order complied with, if applicable; and

Order its enforcement in any county of the Commonwealth in the same manner as an interpersonal protective order of this state issued pursuant to KRS

456.060

.

The clerk shall notify the person who filed the foreign protective order of the decision of the court and provide the person a certified copy of the affidavit declaring the authentication of the order.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 102, § 33, effective January 1, 2016.

456.160.
Clearing of foreign protective order as active record form Law Information Network of Kentucky.

A foreign protective order which has been entered into the Law Information Network of Kentucky shall be immediately cleared as an active record from the computer system when:

The order expires according to the terms contained therein;

A Kentucky court notifies the Law Information Network of Kentucky that a foreign protective order has been dismissed, either by court order or entry of notification by a circuit clerk; or

A circuit clerk notifies the Law Information Network of Kentucky that a foreign protective order tendered to the clerk has not been authenticated in the time period specified in KRS

456.140

.

For validation purposes, the Law Information Network of Kentucky shall provide the circuit court clerk with a printout of foreign protective orders. The clerk shall validate each order annually by contacting the original issuing court or jurisdiction. If the clerk has not received information from the foreign jurisdiction within thirty-one (31) days, the clerk shall cause those orders to be cleared from the Law Information Network of Kentucky.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 102, § 34, effective January 1, 2016.

456.170.
Notice to court of foreign protective order’s expiration, vacation, modification, or other change.

A person who has filed a foreign protective order in a court in Kentucky is under a continuing obligation to inform the court of any expiration, vacation, modification, or other change in the order which the person filing the order has received from the issuing foreign court.

A person who has filed a foreign protective order in a court in Kentucky shall, within two (2) working days of the occurrence of any event specified in subsection (1) of this section, notify the clerk of the court in which the foreign protective order was filed of the fact of the changed order and present the clerk with a copy of the order for authentication as provided in this chapter. The clerk shall immediately notify the Law Information Network of Kentucky entering agency of the modification.

No court in Kentucky and no peace officer in Kentucky shall be expected to enforce a provision of a foreign protective order which has been the subject of any action specified in subsection (1) of this section, unless proper notice has been given in accordance with this section.

Intentional failure of a person who has filed a foreign protective order to make the notifications required by this section in the manner required by this section shall constitute contempt of court and may be grounds for an appropriate civil action brought by any person damaged by the intentional act of omission by the person failing to act.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 102, § 35, effective January 1, 2016.

456.180.
Violation of order of protection.

Violation of the terms or conditions of an order of protection after the person has been served or given notice of the order shall constitute contempt of court and a criminal offense under this section. Once a criminal or contempt proceeding has been initiated, the other shall not be undertaken regardless of the outcome of the original proceeding.

Court proceedings for contempt of court for violation of an order of protection shall be held in the county where the order was issued or filed.

Court proceedings for a criminal violation of an order of protection shall follow the rules of venue applicable to criminal cases generally.

Nothing in this section shall preclude the Commonwealth from prosecuting and convicting the respondent of criminal offenses other than violation of an order of protection.

A person is guilty of a violation of an order of protection when he or she intentionally violates the provisions of an interpersonal protective order after the person has been served or given notice of the order.

Violation of an order of protection is a Class A misdemeanor.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 102, § 36, effective January 1, 2016.